tr: Yay sistemi türü: Bonnell yay sistemi; Kesintisiz yay sistemi; Mikro yay sistemi; Yaysız; Ofset yay sistemi; Paket yay sistemi; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava zavojnica: Bonnell opruge; Kontinuirane opruge; Mikro opruge; Bez opruga; Offset opruge; Džepičaste opruge; Ostalo
el: Τύπος συστήματος πηνίου: Ελατήρια Bonnell; Συνεχόμενα ελατήρια; Μικροελατήρια; Χωρίς ελατήρια; Ελατήρια Offset; Ανεξάρτητα ελατήρια; Άλλο
fi: Lämmitysvastusjärjestelmän tyyppi: Bonnell-jouset; Jatkuvat jouset; Mikrojouset; Ei jousia; Offset-jouset; Pussijouset; Muu
sv: Typ av fjädersystem: Bonnellresårer; Kontinuerliga resårer; Mikroresårer; Utan resårer; Offset-resårer; Pocketresårer; Övrigt
it: Tipo di sistema a bobina: Molle Bonnell; Molle continue; Micromolle; Senza molle; Molle offset; Molle insacchettate; Altro
hu: Tekercsrendszer típusa: Bonnell rugó; Folytonos rugó; Mikrorugó; Rugó nélküli; Offset rugó; Táskarugó; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ričių sistemos tipas: „Bonnell“ spyruoklės; Ištisinės spyruoklės; Mikrospyruoklės; Be spyruoklių; „Offset“ spyruoklės; Kišeninės spyruoklės; Kita
sk-SK: Typ systému vinutia: Bonnellove pružiny; Kontinuálne pružiny; Mikropružiny; Bez pružín; Offsetové pružiny; Taštičkové pružiny; Iné
th: ประเภทของระบบสปริง: บอนเนลล์คอยล์; คอยล์สปริงแบบต่อเนื่อง; ไมโครคอยล์; ไม่มีคอยล์สปริง; ออฟเซตคอยล์; พ็อกเก็ตคอยล์; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ systemu sprężyn: Sprężyny bonellowe; Sprężyny ciągłe; Mikrosprężyny; Bez sprężyn; Sprężyny offsetowe; Sprężyny kieszeniowe; Inny
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema de bobina: Molas bonnell; Molas contínuas; Micromolas; Sem molas; Molas offset; Molas ensacadas; Outro
nl: Veersysteem type: Bonnell-vering; Continue vering; Micro-pocketvering; Geen veren; Offset-veren; Pocketvering; Overig
nb: Spolesystemtype: Bonnell-fjærer; Kontinuerlige fjærer; Mikrofjærer; Uten fjærer; Offset-fjærer; Pocketfjærer; Annet
cs: Typ cívkového systému: Bonnellové pružiny; Kontinuální pružiny; Mikropružiny; Bez pružin; Offsetové pružiny; Taštičkové pružiny; Jiný
pt-BR: Tipo de sistema da bobina: Molas Bonnell; Molas contínuas; Micromolas; Sem molas; Molas offset; Molas ensacadas; Outros
ru: Тип пружинной системы: Пружины Боннель; Непрерывные пружины; Микропружины; Без пружин; Пружины со смещением (Offset); Независимые пружины (Pocket); Другое
vi: Loại hệ thống lò xo: Lò xo liên kết (Bonnell); Lò xo liên tục; Lò xo siêu nhỏ; Không có lò xo; Lò xo offset; Lò xo túi; Khác
ko: 코일 시스템 유형: 본넬 코일; 연속 코일; 마이크로 코일; 코일 없음; 오프셋 코일; 포켓 코일; 기타
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului de bobine: Arcuri Bonnell; Arcuri continue; Microarcuri; Fără arcuri; Arcuri Offset; Arcuri împachetate individual (pocket); Altele
fr: Type de système de ressorts: Ressorts Bonnell; Ressorts continus; Micro-ressorts; Sans ressorts; Ressorts offset; Ressorts ensachés; Autre
de: Typ des Federsystems: Bonnellfederkern; Endlosfederkern; Mikrofedern; Ohne Federkern; Offset-Federkern; Taschenfederkern; Andere
zh-TW: 線圈系統類型: 連結式彈簧 (Bonnell); 一線鋼彈簧; 微型彈簧; 無彈簧; 偏心彈簧; 獨立筒彈簧; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta tuljavnega sistema: Vzmeti Bonnell; Zvezne vzmeti (žično jedro); Mikro vzmeti; Brez vzmeti; Offset vzmeti; Žepkaste vzmeti; Drugo
zh-CN: 螺旋系统类型: 邦内尔弹簧; 连续弹簧; 微型弹簧; 无弹簧; 偏心弹簧; 独立袋装弹簧; 其他
da: Type af spiralsystem: Bonellfjedre; Kontinuerlige fjedre; Mikrofjedre; Uden fjedre; Offsetfjedre; Pocketfjedre; Andet
bg-BG: Тип система от пружини: Бонел пружини; Непрекъснати пружини; Микро пружини; Без пружини; Офсетни пружини; Покет пружини; Други
es: Tipo de sistema de resorte helicoidal: Resortes Bonnell; Resortes continuos; Microresortes; Sin resortes; Resortes offset; Resortes ensacados; Otro
ja: コイルシステムタイプ: ボンネルコイル; 連続コイル; マイクロコイル; コイルなし; オフセットコイル; ポケットコイル; その他
en: Coil system type: Bonnell coils; Continuous coils; Micro coils; No coils; Offset coils; Pocket coils; Other